Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1301YH (1) 91 nls/ko H.F. 219 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 507B.4D Medical malpractice policy 1 limit ââ insurer liability. 2 An insurance company insuring a health care provider, as 3 defined in section 135P.1, against professional negligence 4 shall at all times negotiate in good faith all claims presented 5 to the provider. If a claimant offers to settle a claim 6 within the professional negligence insurance policy coverage 7 limits and the insurance company refuses or declines the 8 offer and the claim proceeds to judgment in excess of the 9 insurance policy coverage limits, the insurance company shall 10 be liable for the full amount of the judgment regardless 11 of the existing insurance policy coverage limitation. The 12 insurance company has a duty to negotiate a settlement within 13 the policy limits if an offer is made by a claimant at or 14 within the policy limits. If the insurance company does not 15 do so, the health care provider shall have a cause of action 16 against the insurance company for the failure to negotiate a 17 settlement within the policy limits. The damages shall include 18 the recovery of all costs the health care provider incurs and 19 reasonable attorney fees. 20